Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 61.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-223.01
Barber shops and barber schools; sanitary requirements; inspections.

The board shall by rules and regulations duly adopted prescribe sanitary requirements for barber shops and barber schools. The board or its employees shall regularly inspect all barber shops and barber schools in this state to insure compliance with such regulations. Such sanitary requirements and inspections shall include all activities, in addition to barbering as defined in section 71-202, taking place on the licensed premises. A written report of each such inspection made shall be submitted to the board. Each school or barber shop shall be called upon at least once each licensing period for the purpose of inspection prior to the issuance of its license to be eligible for renewal of certification or registration.

Laws 1963, c. 409, § 29, p. 1328;

Laws 1971, LB 1020, § 28;

Laws 1978, LB 722, § 18;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 483;

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 95;

Laws 1999, LB 121, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 61.
August 30, 2009>